Illinois, session 104th, SB380.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom From Location Surveillance Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 168/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Freedom From Location Surveillance Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-1104, eff. 8-26-14.)